Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1819
Real property taxes; certificate of purchase; form.

The certificate shall be substantially in the following form: COUNTY TREASURER'S CERTIFICATE OF TAX SALE. State of Nebraska .............. County, ss: I, .............. treasurer of the county of .............., in the State of Nebraska, do hereby certify that the following described real estate in such county and state: (describe the same) was, on the .......... day of .......... 20...., duly sold by me in the manner provided by law for the delinquent taxes for the years .....(list years)..... thereon, amounting to .......... dollars, including interest thereon, and costs allowed by law, to ........... for the sum of .......... dollars. I further certify that unless redemption is made of such real estate in the manner provided by law, the .........., heirs or assigns will be entitled to a deed therefor on surrender of this certificate, and compliance with the provisions required by law, on and after the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., for real property determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section 77-1837, or on and after the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., for any other real property.

In witness whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this .......... day of .......... A.D. 20.... .

(L.S.) ....................., Treasurer.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 209, p. 464;

R.S.1913, § 6537;

C.S.1922, § 6065;

C.S.1929, § 77-2017;

R.S.1943, § 77-1819;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 32;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 23.

This section does not require treasurer's official seal to be affixed to tax sale certificate. County of Lincoln v. Evans, 185 Neb. 19, 173 N.W.2d 365 (1969).